praksid/praks-1/naide1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N  ! nimisõna		/ substantive		
+A  ! omadussõna		/ adjective		

+Sg  ! ainsus	/ singular
+Pl  ! mitmus	/ plural
+Nom  ! nimetav			/ nominative	
+Gen  ! omastav 			/ genitive	
+Par  ! osastav			/ partitive	
+Ill  ! sisseütlev			/ illative	
+Ine  ! seesütlev			/ inessive	
+Ela  ! seestütlev			/ elative	
+All  ! alaleütlev			/ allative	
+Ade  ! alalütlev			/ adessive	
+Abl  ! alaltütlev			/ ablative	
+Tra  ! saav				/ translative	
+Trm  ! rajav				/ terminative	
+Ess  ! olev				/ essive	
+Abe  ! ilmaütlev			/ abessive	
+Com  ! kaasaütlev			/ comitative	

LEXICON Root

koli+N:koli tüüp_ema ;    ! leksikaalne pool : pindesitus
kena+A:kena tüüp_ema ;
siil+N:siil tüüp_taud ;    
torssis+A:torssis # ;     ! muutumatu omadussõna

LEXICON tüüp_ema
    +Sg+Nom: # ;
           : gen_jt ;
    +Sg+Par: # ;
        +Pl:de sem_käänded ;

LEXICON tüüp_taud
    +Sg+Nom: # ;
           :i gen_jt ;
    +Sg+Par:i # ;
    +Sg+Ill:i # ;      ! lühike sisseütlev
        +Pl:ide sem_käänded ;

LEXICON gen_jt
    +Pl+Nom:d # ;
        +Sg: sem_käänded ;

LEXICON sem_käänded
       +Ill:sse # ;	
       +Ine:s # ;	
       +Ela:st # ;	
       +All:le # ;	
       +Ade:l # ;	
       +Abl:lt # ;	
       +Tra:ks # ;	
       +Trm:ni # ;	
       +Ess:na # ;	
       +Abe:ta # ;	
       +Com:ga # ;	

    
